Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.120

Registration by mail.

Any elector of this state may register to vote by mail under this title.

[ 2004 c 267 s 109; 2003 c 111 s 208. Prior: 1993 c 434 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.08.030.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.